Utah statutes.
20A-5-408.   Disposition of election returns.
(1)  Each election officer shall produce the packages containing the election
returns before the board of canvassers.
(2)  As soon as the returns are canvassed, the election officer shall file the
pollbook, lists, and papers produced before the board as required by Section
20A-4-202.
